Washington statutes.
RCW 43.160.010

Findings.

(1) The legislature finds that it is the public policy of the state of Washington to direct financial resources toward the fostering of economic development through the stimulation of investment and job opportunities and the retention of sustainable existing employment for the general welfare of the inhabitants of the state. Reducing unemployment and reducing the time citizens remain jobless is important for the economic welfare of the state. A valuable means of fostering economic development is the construction of public facilities which contribute to the stability and growth of the state's economic base. Expenditures made for these purposes as authorized in this chapter are declared to be in the public interest, and constitute a proper use of public funds. A community economic revitalization board is needed which shall aid the development of economic opportunities. The general objectives of the board should include:

(a) Strengthening the economies of areas of the state which have experienced or are expected to experience chronically high unemployment rates or below average growth in their economies;

(b) Encouraging the diversification of the economies of the state and regions within the state in order to provide greater seasonal and cyclical stability of income and employment;

(c) Encouraging wider access to financial resources for both large and small industrial development projects;

(d) Encouraging new economic development or expansions to maximize employment;

(e) Encouraging the retention of viable existing firms and employment;

(f) Providing incentives for expansion of employment opportunities for groups of state residents that have been less successful relative to other groups in efforts to gain permanent employment; and

(g) Enhancing job and business growth through facility development and other improvements in innovation partnership zones designated under RCW 43.330.270.

(2) The legislature also finds that the state's economic development efforts can be enhanced by, in certain instances, providing funds to improve state highways, county roads, or city streets for industries considering locating or expanding in this state.

(3) The legislature finds it desirable to provide a process whereby the need for diverse public works improvements necessitated by planned economic development can be addressed in a timely fashion and with coordination among all responsible governmental entities.

(4) The legislature also finds that the state's economic development efforts can be enhanced by, in certain instances, providing funds to assist development of telecommunications infrastructure that supports business development, retention, and expansion in the state.

(5) The legislature also finds that the state's economic development efforts can be enhanced by providing funds to improve markets for those recyclable materials representing a large fraction of the waste stream. The legislature finds that public facilities which result in private construction of processing or remanufacturing facilities for recyclable materials are eligible for consideration from the board.

(6) The legislature finds that sharing economic growth statewide is important to the welfare of the state. The ability of communities to pursue business and job retention, expansion, and development opportunities depends on their capacity to ready necessary economic development project plans, sites, permits, and infrastructure for private investments. Project-specific planning, predevelopment, and infrastructure are critical ingredients for economic development. It is, therefore, the intent of the legislature to increase the amount of funding available through the community economic revitalization board and to authorize flexibility for available resources in these areas to help fund planning, predevelopment, and construction costs of infrastructure and facilities and sites that foster economic vitality and diversification.

[ 2012 c 225 s 2; 2008 c 327 s 1. Prior: 1999 c 164 s 101; 1999 c 94 s 5; 1996 c 51 s 1; 1991 c 314 s 21; 1989 c 431 s 61; 1987 c 422 s 1; 1984 c 257 s 1; 1982 1st ex.s. c 40 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 327 ss 1, 2, 4-11, 17: "Sections 1, 2, 4 through 11, and 17 of this act take effect July 1, 2009." [ 2008 c 327 s 18.]

Findings—Intent—1999 c 164: "The legislature finds that while Washington's economy is currently prospering, economic growth continues to be uneven, particularly as between metropolitan and rural areas. This has created in effect two Washingtons. One afflicted by inadequate infrastructure to support and attract investment, another suffering from congestion and soaring housing prices. In order to address these problems, the legislature intends to use resources strategically to build on our state's strengths while addressing threats to our prosperity." [ 1999 c 164 s 1.]

Part headings and subheadings not law—1999 c 164: "Part headings and subheadings used in this act are not any part of the law." [ 1999 c 164 s 801.]

Effective date—1999 c 164: "This act takes effect August 1, 1999." [ 1999 c 164 s 802.]

Severability—1999 c 164: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1999 c 164 s 804.]

Legislative finding—Effective dates—1999 c 94: See notes following RCW 43.84.092.

Severability—1996 c 51: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1996 c 51 s 11.]

Effective dates—1996 c 51: "(1) Sections 1 through 9 and 11 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1996.

(2) Section 10 of this act shall take effect June 30, 1997." [ 1996 c 51 s 12.]

Findings—1991 c 314: See note following RCW 43.160.020.